Wisconsin, session 2025, SB812.
do enact as follows:SB812,13Section 1. 77.54 (76) of the statutes is created to read:SB812,2,2177.54 (76) (a) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other 2consumption of movie projectors sold to a movie theater.SB812,2,93(b) At the time that the department determines that revenues from the taxes 4imposed under ss. 77.52 and 77.53 have cumulatively decreased by $2,000,000 due 5to the exemption under par. (a), the department shall send a notice to the legislative 6reference bureau for publication in the Wisconsin Administrative Register that 7states the date on which the revenues from the taxes imposed under ss. 77.52 and 877.53 have cumulatively decreased by $2,000,000 due to the exemption under par. 9(a).SB812,2,1110(c) This subsection does not apply after either of the following, whichever is 11earlier:SB812,2,13121. The first day of the 25th month beginning after the effective date of this 13subdivision .... [LRB inserts date].SB812,2,15142. The first day of the 3rd month beginning after the date of the notice under 15par. (b).SB812,216Section 2. Effective date.SB812,2,1817(1) Sales tax exemption for theater projectors. This act takes effect on 18the first day of the 3rd month after publication.SB812,2,1919